Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB356.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 21 of the act of June 20, 1919 (P.L.521, No.258), referred to as the Transfer Inheritance Tax Law, is amended to read:Section 21. The registers of wills shall, immediately upon assuming office, file with the Department of Revenue the bond hereinafter required for the collection of the said tax in the case of resident decedents. The registers of wills shall pay 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 over to the general fund of the county for the use of the county [a percentage of the gross amount collected during any year, as follows: four and one-quarter per centum upon the tax collected, if such tax shall amount to a sum of two hundred thousand ($200,000) dollars or less; one and three-quarters per centum on the amounts collected in excess of two hundred thousand ($200,000) dollars and up to and including one million ($1,000,000) dollars; and one-half of one per centum on the amounts collected in excess of one million ($1,000,000) dollars.] four and one-quarter per centum of the gross amount collected during any year.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0356PN0311 - 2 - 123456789101112